Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.640

Committee objections to agency intended action—Statement in register and WAC—Suspension of rule.

(1) Within seven days of an agency hearing held after notification of the agency by the rules review committee pursuant to RCW 34.05.620 or 34.05.630, the affected agency shall notify the committee of its intended action on a proposed or existing rule to which the committee objected or on a committee finding of the agency's failure to adopt rules.

(2) If the rules review committee finds by a majority vote of its members: (a) That the proposed or existing rule in question will not be modified, amended, withdrawn, or repealed by the agency so as to conform with the intent of the legislature, (b) that an existing rule was not adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law, or (c) that the agency will not replace the policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, with a rule, the rules review committee may, within thirty days from notification by the agency of its intended action, file with the code reviser notice of its objections together with a concise statement of the reasons therefor. Such notice and statement shall also be provided to the agency by the rules review committee.

(3)(a) If the rules review committee makes an adverse finding regarding an existing rule under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section, the committee may, by a majority vote of its members, recommend suspension of the rule. Within seven days of such vote the committee shall transmit to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature, the governor, the code reviser, and the agency written notice of its objection and recommended suspension and the concise reasons therefor. Within thirty days of receipt of the notice, the governor shall transmit to the committee, the code reviser, and the agency written approval or disapproval of the recommended suspension. If the suspension is approved by the governor, it is effective from the date of that approval and continues until ninety days after the expiration of the next regular legislative session.

(b) If the rules review committee makes an adverse finding regarding a policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, under subsection (2)(c) of this section, the committee may, by a majority vote of its members, advise the governor of its finding.

(4) The code reviser shall publish transmittals from the rules review committee or the governor issued pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section in the Washington state register and shall publish in the next supplement and compilation of the Washington Administrative Code a reference to the committee's objection or recommended suspension and the governor's action on it and to the issue of the Washington state register in which the full text thereof appears.

(5) The reference shall be removed from a rule published in the Washington Administrative Code if a subsequent adjudicatory proceeding determines that the rule is within the intent of the legislature or was adopted in accordance with all applicable laws, whichever was the objection of the rules review committee.

[ 1998 c 21 s 2; 1996 c 318 s 5; 1994 c 249 s 19; 1993 c 277 s 2; 1988 c 288 s 604; 1987 c 451 s 3; 1981 c 324 s 8. Formerly RCW 34.04.240.]

NOTES:

Severability—Application—1994 c 249: See notes following RCW 34.05.310.

Legislative affirmation—Severability—1981 c 324: See notes following RCW 34.05.010.